District of Columbia statutes.
42-3502.03b

Rent Administrator — Qualifications and compensation.

The Rent Administrator shall:

(1)

Be admitted to practice before the District of Columbia Court of Appeals by the time the Rent Administrator’s term of office commences;

(2)

Be a resident of the District within 6 months of the commencement of the Rent Administrator’s term of office;

(3)

Possess skills and expertise relevant to rental housing, preferably in the area of rent control or rent stabilization; and

(4)

Receive annual compensation equivalent to that received by a District employee compensated at the grade of 15 of the District schedule established under subchapter XI of Chapter 6 of Title 1 [§ 1-611.01 et seq.].

July 17, 1985, D.C. Law 6-10, § 203b
as added Mar. 25, 2009, D.C. Law 17-366, § 2(e), 56 DCR 1332